Washington statutes.
RCW 36.80.050

Highway plat record.

He or she shall ensure that a highway plat record is kept and is publicly accessible, in which he or she shall have accurately platted all public roads and highways established by the board.

[ 2016 c 19 s 6; 2009 c 549 s 4134; 1963 c 4 s 36.80.050. Prior: 1907 c 160 s 2; RRS s 4149.]

NOTES:

Intent—2016 c 19: See note following RCW 36.87.120.